Illinois, session 104th, HB4608.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 45-46 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/45-46)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2030)8    Sec. 45-46. Mid-size businesses.9    (a) As used in this the Section, "mid-size business" means 10a business that is independently owned and operated and that 11is not dominant in its field of operation. "Mid-size business" 12includes a construction business with annual sales and 13receipts in excess of $14,000,000 but not over $45,000,000.14    (a-5) This Section applies only to construction-related 15procurements for the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority. 16    (b) The chief procurement officer shall adopt rules to 17establish additional criteria to designate mid-size businesses 18for the purposes of the mid-size business set-asides described 19in subsection (c), including the number of employees and 20annual sales and receipts of the business. When computing the 21size status of a potential contractor, annual sales and 22receipts of the potential contractor and all of its affiliates 23shall be included. The maximum number of employees and the   HB4608- 2 -LRB104 19257 HLH 32703 b1maximum annual sales and receipts that a mid-size business may 2have under the rules adopted by the chief procurement officer 3may vary from industry to industry, to the extent necessary to 4reflect differing characteristics of those industries, subject 5to the limitation that no business shall qualify as a mid-size 6business if its annual sales and receipts exceed $45,000,000.7    (c) The applicable chief procurement officer shall 8designate a fair proportion, as determined by the applicable 9chief procurement officer in consultation with the Illinois 10State Toll Highway Authority, of construction, 11construction-related, and construction support contracts as 12mid-size business set-asides for award to mid-size businesses 13in Illinois. Advertisements for bids or offers for these 14contracts shall specify designation as mid-size business 15set-asides. In awarding the contracts, only bids or offers 16from qualified mid-size businesses shall be considered. The 17Illinois State Toll Highway Authority may award up to 4 18contracts pursuant to this Section per calendar year and may 19award up to a total of 10 contracts pursuant to this Section. 20The Illinois State Toll Highway Authority shall prepare an 21annual report setting forth the use of this Section during the 22preceding fiscal year and shall provide that report to the 23applicable chief procurement officer no later than March 1 of 24each calendar year. This Section is inoperable 5 years after 25the award of the first contract under this Section. This 26Section is repealed on July 1, 2031 5 years after the effective   HB4608- 3 -LRB104 19257 HLH 32703 b1date of this Section.2(Source: P.A. 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.)